Montana, session 2025, SB12.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 18-7-401, MCA, is amended to read:
"18-7-401. Purpose of part. The purpose of this part is to provide:
(1) for the board of county printing department of administration to set maximum prices that may
be charged for county legal advertising; and
(2) for the purchase of county printed forms and materials."
Section 2. Section 18-7-402, MCA, is amended to read:
"18-7-402. Definition. Unless the context requires otherwise, in this part "board" "department" means
the board of county printing department of administration provided for in 2-15-1026 2-15-1001."
Section 3. Section 18-7-404, MCA, is amended to read:
"18-7-404. Establishment of maximum prices -- rulemaking. (1) The board shall adopt, by rule,
and publish a schedule of maximum prices to be charged for county legal advertising is $14 for each folio for
the first insertion, with a follow-on rate of $12 for each folio for any subsequent insertion.
(2) (i) The board department shall conduct hearings when required to determine maximum rates
for county legal advertising. Notice of the hearing must be mailed to the Montana association of counties and
the Montana newspaper association annually adjust the maximum prices in subsection (1) using the lower of an
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 12
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 12
inflation factor of 2% or the actual inflation determined by the consumer price index for all urban consumers as
published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor. The adjusted prices
become effective on March 1 of each year.
(ii) The department shall publish the adjusted prices as a rule.
(3) The board department shall deliver, free of charge, to each board of county commissioners in
this state a copy of every schedule of maximum prices adopted by the board department within 30 days of its
publication, together with a notice of the date fixed by the board when the prices will be effective.
(4) The county commissioners shall require each establishment that prints county legal advertising
to verify that:
(a) the legal advertisement was published on the dates ordered by the county and in the style set
by the board department; and
(b) the price was not in excess of the maximum price set by the board department.
(5) The board department may not establish maximum prices for printed county forms."
Section 4. Section 18-7-405, MCA, is amended to read:
"18-7-405. Adoption of printing standards. The board department shall adopt necessary standards
for typeface, type size, type style, and type leading for county legal advertising."
Section 5. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are repealed:
2-15-1026. Board of county printing -- composition -- allocation -- compensation.
18-7-403. Meetings of board of county printing.
Section 6. Transition. A person appointed to the board of county printing shall serve until [the
effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 12
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 12, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 12
INTRODUCED BY J. TREBAS
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
AN ACT ELIMINATING THE BOARD OF COUNTY PRINTING AND TRANSFERRING ITS DUTIES TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AMENDING SECTIONS 18-
7-401, 18-7-402, 18-7-404, AND 18-7-405, MCA; AND REPEALING SECTIONS 2-15-1026 AND 18-7-403, MCA.